Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2084
Repealed. Laws 2014, LB749, § 298. Operative date January 1, 2017. Resignation of directors.

(1) A director may resign at any time by delivering written notice to the board of directors, to its chairperson, or to the corporation.

(2) The resignation shall be effective when notice is delivered unless the notice specifies a later effective date.

Laws 1995, LB 109, § 84.